Utah statutes.
17B-1-1002.   Limit on local district property tax levy -- Exclusions.

(1)  The rate at which a local district levies a property tax for district operation and maintenance expenses on the taxable value of taxable property within the district may not exceed:

(a)  .0008, for a basic local district;

(b)  .0004, for a cemetery maintenance district;

(c)  .0004, for a drainage district;

(d)  .0008, for a fire protection district;

(e)  .0008, for an improvement district;

(f)  .0005, for a metropolitan water district;

(g)  .0004, for a mosquito abatement district;

(h)  .0004, for a public transit district;

(i) (i)  .0023, for a service area that:

(A)  is located in a county of the first or second class; and

(B)  provides fire protection, paramedic, and emergency services; or

(ii)  .0014, for each other service area; or

(j)  the rates provided in Section 17B-2a-1006, for a water conservancy district.

(2)  Property taxes levied by a local district are excluded from the limit applicable to that district under Subsection (1) if the taxes are:

(a)  levied under Section 17B-1-1103 by a local district, other than a water conservancy district, to pay principal of and interest on general obligation bonds issued by the district;

(b)  levied to pay debt and interest owed to the United States; or

(c)  levied to pay assessments or other amounts due to a water users association or other public cooperative or private entity from which the district procures water.

